Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) The legislature finds that:(a) The continuity and sustainability of victim services programs are essential to public safety;(b) Federal victims of crime act funding is the most significant resource for crime victim services in Washington state, funding programs in every county and for every type of harm;(c) The fluctuations of federal funding levels strain the infrastructure needed to equitably resource victim services; and(d) The consequences of unstable and insufficient funding has immediate impacts on the lives and safety of crime victims, families, and communities.(2) Washington state commits to providing for the continuity of victim services programs to ensure trauma-informed, culturally relevant, accessible, and high-quality services for victims of crime.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 7.68 RCW to read as follows:(1) In each fiscal year, the legislature shall include in the annual budget bill an appropriation that, together with the amount received under the federal victims of crime act in the prior year, totals:(a) An aggregate $50,000,000 annually for the 2025-2027 and 2027-2029 biennia;(b) An aggregate $60,000,000 annually for the 2029â2031 and 2031â2033 biennia;(c) An aggregate $70,000,000 annually for the 2033â2035 biennium and thereafter.(2) After reaching an aggregate of $70,000,000, the office of crime victims advocacy shall submit a report to the legislature with data on crime victim services and recommendations for future aggregate funding levels every five years, with a preliminary report due December 15, 2039.(3) The office of crime victims advocacy shall support programs providing services for victims of crime throughout the state and ensure that state funds awarded under this section:(a) Are administered in a unified process with federal victims of crime act funds and the victims of crime act state plan, with separate reporting as necessary to comply with federal and state regulations;(b) Shall be used to supplement, but not supplant, funding that the programs receive from other sources;(c) May be used as a match for federal victims of crime act funds; and(d) May not be used for capital projects.--- END ---